lexc-files/inflections/noun/noun-infl_finalE-hop.txt
^[Loc.3PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}ngitni  PostInflIX; ^[Loc.3PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}ngitni  PostInflIX; ^[Loc.3PlPoss.Du]:^%{.f.%}ngitni  PostInflIX;
^[Loc.3PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.fS.%}ngitni PostInflIX; ^[Loc.3PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.fS.%}ngitni PostInflIX; ^[Loc.3PlPoss.Du]:^%{.fS.%}ngitni PostInflIX;
^[Loc.3DuPoss.Sg]:^gkeni          PostInflIX; ^[Loc.3DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}ngitni  PostInflIX; ^[Loc.3DuPoss.Du]:^%{.f.%}ngitni  PostInflIX;
                                              ^[Loc.3DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.fS.%}ngitni PostInflIX; ^[Loc.3DuPoss.Du]:^%{.fS.%}ngitni PostInflIX;
!-------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------|
^[Loc.4SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}mini    PostInflIX; ^[Loc.4SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}mini    PostInflIX; ^[Loc.4SgPoss.Du]:^gmini          PostInflIX;
^[Loc.4PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}meggni  PostInflIX; ^[Loc.4PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}meggni  PostInflIX; ^[Loc.4PlPoss.Du]:^gmeggni        PostInflIX;
^[Loc.4DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}megni   PostInflIX; ^[Loc.4DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}megni   PostInflIX; ^[Loc.4DuPoss.Du]:^gmegni         PostInflIX;
^[Loc.4DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}megteni PostInflIX; ^[Loc.4DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}megteni PostInflIX; ^[Loc.4DuPoss.Du]:^gmegteni       PostInflIX;
!-------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------|

!--------------------------------------------|
!           ALLATIVE (terminalis)            |
!--------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|
^[All.Sg]:^%{.f.%}mun              PostInflIX; ^[All.Pl]:^nun                     PostInflIX; ^[All.Du]:^gnun                    PostInflIX;
!--------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|
^[All.1SgPoss.Sg]:^mnun            PostInflIX; ^[All.1SgPoss.Pl]:^mnun            PostInflIX; ^[All.1SgPoss.Du]:^gemnun          PostInflIX;
^[All.1PlPoss.Sg]:^mnnun           PostInflIX; ^[All.1PlPoss.Pl]:^mnnun           PostInflIX; ^[All.1PlPoss.Du]:^gemnnun         PostInflIX;
^[All.1DuPoss.Sg]:^mtegnun         PostInflIX; ^[All.1DuPoss.Pl]:^mtegnun         PostInflIX; ^[All.1DuPoss.Du]:^gemtegnun       PostInflIX;
!--------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|
^[All.2SgPoss.Sg]:^gpenun          PostInflIX; ^[All.2SgPoss.Pl]:^gpenun          PostInflIX; ^[All.2SgPoss.Du]:^gpenun          PostInflIX;
^[All.2SgPoss.Sg]:^gpegnun         PostInflIX; ^[All.2SgPoss.Pl]:^gpegnun         PostInflIX; ^[All.2SgPoss.Du]:^gpegnun         PostInflIX;
^[All.2PlPoss.Sg]:^gpesinun        PostInflIX; ^[All.2PlPoss.Pl]:^gpesinun        PostInflIX; ^[All.2PlPoss.Du]:^gpesinun        PostInflIX;
^[All.2DuPoss.Sg]:^gpetegnun       PostInflIX; ^[All.2DuPoss.Pl]:^gpetegnun       PostInflIX; ^[All.2DuPoss.Du]:^gpetegnun       PostInflIX;
!--------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|
^[All.3SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}nganun   PostInflIX; ^[All.3SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}nganun   PostInflIX; ^[All.3SgPoss.Du]:^gkenun          PostInflIX;
^[All.3SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.fS.%}nganun  PostInflIX; ^[All.3SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.fS.%}nganun  PostInflIX;                                              |
^[All.3PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}ngitnun  PostInflIX; ^[All.3PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}ngitnun  PostInflIX; ^[All.3PlPoss.Du]:^%{.f.%}ngitnun  PostInflIX;
^[All.3PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.fS.%}ngitnun PostInflIX; ^[All.3PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.fS.%}ngitnun PostInflIX; ^[All.3PlPoss.Du]:^%{.fS.%}ngitnun PostInflIX;
                                               ^[All.3DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.fS.%}ngitnun PostInflIX; ^[All.3DuPoss.Du]:^%{.fS.%}ngitnun PostInflIX;
!--------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|
^[All.4SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}munnun   PostInflIX; ^[All.4SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}munnun   PostInflIX; ^[All.4SgPoss.Du]:^gmunnun         PostInflIX;
^[All.4PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}meggnun  PostInflIX; ^[All.4PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}meggnun  PostInflIX; ^[All.4PlPoss.Du]:^gmeggnun        PostInflIX;
^[All.4DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}megnun   PostInflIX; ^[All.4DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}megnun   PostInflIX; ^[All.4DuPoss.Du]:^gmegnun         PostInflIX;
^[All.4DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}megtenun PostInflIX; ^[All.4DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}megtenun PostInflIX; ^[All.4DuPoss.Du]:^gmegtenun       PostInflIX;
!--------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|

!-----------------------------------------------|
!             PERLATIVE (vialis)                |
!-----------------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------|
^[Prl.Sg]:^%{.f.%}kun                 PostInflIX; ^[Prl.Pl]:^tgun                       PostInflIX; ^[Prl.Du]:^gnekun                   PostInflIX;
!-----------------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------|
^[Prl.1SgPoss.Sg]:^mkun               PostInflIX; ^[Prl.1SgPoss.Pl]:^mkun               PostInflIX; ^[Prl.1SgPoss.Du]:^gemkun           PostInflIX;
^[Prl.1PlPoss.Sg]:^mteggun            PostInflIX; ^[Prl.1PlPoss.Pl]:^mteggun            PostInflIX; ^[Prl.1PlPoss.Du]:^gemteggun        PostInflIX;
^[Prl.1DuPoss.Sg]:^mtegnegun          PostInflIX; ^[Prl.1DuPoss.Pl]:^mtegnegun          PostInflIX; ^[Prl.1DuPoss.Du]:^gemtegnegun      PostInflIX;
!-----------------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------|
^[Prl.2SgPoss.Sg]:^gpegun             PostInflIX; ^[Prl.2SgPoss.Pl]:^gpegun             PostInflIX; ^[Prl.2SgPoss.Du]:^gpegun           PostInflIX;
^[Prl.2PlPoss.Sg]:^gpesigun           PostInflIX; ^[Prl.2PlPoss.Pl]:^gpesigun           PostInflIX; ^[Prl.2PlPoss.Du]:^gpesigun         PostInflIX;
^[Prl.2DuPoss.Sg]:^gpetegnegun        PostInflIX; ^[Prl.2DuPoss.Pl]:^gpetegnegun        PostInflIX; ^[Prl.2DuPoss.Du]:^gpetegnegun      PostInflIX;
!-----------------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------|
^[Prl.3SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}%ngakun     PostInflIX; ^[Prl.3SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}%ngakun     PostInflIX; ^[Prl.3SgPoss.Du]:^gkenkun          PostInflIX;
^[Prl.3SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.fS.%}%ngakun    PostInflIX; ^[Prl.3SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.fS.%}%ngakun    PostInflIX;                                               |
^[Prl.3PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}%ngitgun    PostInflIX; ^[Prl.3PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}%ngitgun    PostInflIX; ^[Prl.3PlPoss.Du]:^%{.f.%}%ngitgun  PostInflIX;
^[Prl.3PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.fS.%}%ngitgun   PostInflIX; ^[Prl.3PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.fS.%}%ngitgun   PostInflIX; ^[Prl.3PlPoss.Du]:^%{.fS.%}%ngitgun PostInflIX;
^[Prl.3DuPoss.Sg]:^gkenkun            PostInflIX; ^[Prl.3DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}%ngakun     PostInflIX; ^[Prl.3PlPoss.Du]:^%{.f.%}%ngitgun  PostInflIX;
                                                  ^[Prl.3DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.fS.%}%ngakun    PostInflIX; ^[Prl.3PlPoss.Du]:^%{.fS.%}%ngitgun PostInflIX;
!-----------------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------|
^[Prl.4SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}mikun       PostInflIX; ^[Prl.4SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}mikun       PostInflIX; ^[Prl.4SgPoss.Du]:^gmikun           PostInflIX;
^[Prl.4PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}megteggun   PostInflIX; ^[Prl.4PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}megteggun   PostInflIX; ^[Prl.4PlPoss.Du]:^gmegteggun       PostInflIX;
^[Prl.4DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}megtegnegun PostInflIX; ^[Prl.4DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}megtegnegun PostInflIX; ^[Prl.4DuPoss.Du]:^gmegtegnegun     PostInflIX;
!-----------------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------|

!--------------------------------------------|
!            EQUATIVE (equalis)              |
!--------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------|
^[Equ.Sg]:^%{.f.%}tun              PostInflIX; ^[Equ.Pl]:^stun                    PostInflIX; ^[Equ.Du]:^gestun                 PostInflIX;
!--------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------|
^[Equ.1SgPoss.Sg]:^mtun            PostInflIX; ^[Equ.1SgPoss.Pl]:^mtun            PostInflIX; ^[Equ.1SgPoss.Du]:^gemtun         PostInflIX;
^[Equ.1PlPoss.Sg]:^mtestun         PostInflIX; ^[Equ.1PlPoss.Pl]:^mtestun         PostInflIX; ^[Equ.1PlPoss.Du]:^gemtestun      PostInflIX;
^[Equ.1DuPoss.Sg]:^mtegestun       PostInflIX; ^[Equ.1DuPoss.Pl]:^mtegestun       PostInflIX; ^[Equ.1DuPoss.Du]:^gemtegestun    PostInflIX;
!--------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------|
^[Equ.2SgPoss.Sg]:^gpetun          PostInflIX; ^[Equ.2SgPoss.Pl]:^gpetun          PostInflIX; ^[Equ.2SgPoss.Du]:^gpetun         PostInflIX;
^[Equ.2PlPoss.Sg]:^gpesistun       PostInflIX; ^[Equ.2PlPoss.Pl]:^gpesistun       PostInflIX; ^[Equ.2PlPoss.Du]:^gpesistun      PostInflIX;
^[Equ.2DuPoss.Sg]:^gpetegetun      PostInflIX; ^[Equ.2DuPoss.Pl]:^gpetegetun      PostInflIX; ^[Equ.2DuPoss.Du]:^gpetegetun     PostInflIX;
!--------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------|
^[Equ.3SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}ngatun   PostInflIX; ^[Equ.3SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}ngatun   PostInflIX; ^[Equ.3SgPoss.Du]:^gketun         PostInflIX;
^[Equ.3SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.fS.%}ngatun  PostInflIX; ^[Equ.3SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.fS.%}ngatun  PostInflIX;                                             |
^[Equ.3PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}ngitun   PostInflIX; ^[Equ.3PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}ngitun   PostInflIX; ^[Equ.3PlPoss.Du]:^%{.f.%}ngitun  PostInflIX;
^[Equ.3PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.fS.%}ngitun  PostInflIX; ^[Equ.3PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.fS.%}ngitun  PostInflIX; ^[Equ.3PlPoss.Du]:^%{.fS.%}ngitun PostInflIX;
^[Equ.3DuPoss.Sg]:^gketun          PostInflIX; ^[Equ.3DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}ngitun   PostInflIX; ^[Equ.3PlPoss.Du]:^%{.f.%}ngitun  PostInflIX;
                                               ^[Equ.3DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.fS.%}ngitun  PostInflIX; ^[Equ.3PlPoss.Du]:^%{.fS.%}ngitun PostInflIX;
!--------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------|
^[Equ.4SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}mitun    PostInflIX; ^[Equ.4SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}mitun    PostInflIX; ^[Equ.4SgPoss.Du]:^gmitun         PostInflIX;
^[Equ.4PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}megestun PostInflIX; ^[Equ.4PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}megestun PostInflIX; ^[Equ.4PlPoss.Du]:^gmegestun      PostInflIX;
^[Equ.4DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}megestun PostInflIX; ^[Equ.4DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}megestun PostInflIX; ^[Equ.4DuPoss.Du]:^gmegestun      PostInflIX;
!--------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------|

!-------------------------------------------|
! Obsolete Verb Root -ete                   |
!   ^[Jacobson (2001) p.78]                 |
!-------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------|
^[Loc.Sg]:^%{.f.%}m              VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.Pl]:^n                     VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.Du]:^gn                    VerbRootEte;
!-------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------|
^[Loc.1SgPoss.Sg]:^mn            VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.1SgPoss.Pl]:^mn            VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.1SgPoss.Du]:^gemn          VerbRootEte;
